Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Chapter 3

Construction, Operation and Effect

32-3-101. Operation of will.

A will shall be construed, in reference to the real and personal estate comprised in it, to speak and take effect as if it had been executed immediately before the death of the testator, and shall convey all the real estate belonging to the testator, or in which the testator had any interest at the testator's decease, unless a contrary intention appear by its words in context.

Code 1858, § 2195 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 2); Shan., § 3927; Code 1932, § 8133; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-301.

Cross-References. Fraudulent devises, title 66, ch. 3, part 2.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Living wills, title 32, ch. 11.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 14, 28, 30, 151, 169, 198, 303, 403, 427.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 45; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 88, 109, 119, 126, 131, 147.

Law Reviews.

Bringing Tennessee into the Twentieth Century Re Possibilities of Reverter, Powers of Termination and Executory Interests When Used as Land Control Devices (Nicholas L. White), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 555 (1985).

Property Law — Wills — Effect of Lapsed Residuary Gifts in the State of Tennessee, 73 Tenn L. Rev. 711 (2006).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

Wills — Construction of “Issue” and the Adopted Child, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 134 (1973).

32-3-102. Devise of land.

Every devise shall convey the entire estate of the testator in the lands, unless the contrary intent plainly appear from the words and context of the will.

Code 1858, § 2164 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Apr.), ch. 22, § 12); Shan., § 3897; Code 1932, § 8091; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-302.

Cross-References. Unlimited power of disposition given to owner of estate for life or years, effect, §66-1-106.

Words passing estate of grantor or devisor in land, §66-5-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 303, 427.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 119, 131.

Law Reviews.

Bringing Tennessee into the Twentieth Century Re Possibilities of Reverter, Powers of Termination and Executory Interests When Used as Land Control Devices (Nicholas L. White), 15 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 555 (1985).

Wills — Precatory Words Insufficient to Create a Trust, 15 Tenn. L. Rev. 729 (1939).

32-3-103. Pretermitted child.

A child born after the making of a will, either before or after the death of the testator, inclusive of a mother-testator, not provided for nor disinherited, but only pretermitted, in the will, and not provided for by settlement made by the testator in the testator's lifetime, shall succeed to the same portion of the testator's estate as if the testator had died intestate.

Toward raising the portion of such child, the devisees and legatees and other heirs shall contribute out of the parts devised, or bequeathed to, or settled upon them by the testator, in the proportion borne by their respective devises, legacies, or settlements to the whole estate of the testator.

Code 1858, §§ 2193, 2194 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 28, § 1); Shan., §§ 3925, 3926; Code 1932, §§ 8131, 8132; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-303, 32-304.

Cross-References. After-born heirs, §31-2-108.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 293, 296, 297, 299-302, 829, 986, 1003.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bastardy and Children Out of Wedlock, §§ 4, 14; 22 Tenn. Juris., Res Judicata, §§ 16, 33; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 114, 180.

Law Reviews.

Decedent's Estates: The Rights of Adopted Persons Under Tennessee's Descent and Distribution and Adoption Statutes to Take by Intestate Succession or by Will or Trust, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (1992).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (Herman L. Trautman), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 882 (1962).

Domestic Relations (William J. Harbison), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 974 (1953).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Some Suggested Legislation in the Field of Wills (W. Raymond Blackard), 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 381 (1937).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

TennCare: Expanded Estate Recovery - Recover at ALL Cost, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 711 (2015).

Wills, Estates and Trusts (William J. Bowe), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1126 (1953).

Wills — Implied Revocation — Effect of Adoption of Child Subsequent to Execution, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 128 (1952).

Wills — Pretermitted Children, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 405 (1943).

32-3-104. Death of class member before time of enjoyment.

Where a bequest, devise, conveyance, transfer or gift is made to a class of persons subject to fluctuation by increase or diminution of its number in consequence of future births or deaths, and the time of payment, distribution, vestiture or enjoyment is fixed at a subsequent period or on the happening of a future event, and any member of the class dies before the arrival of that period or the happening of that event, and has issue surviving when the period arrives or the event happens, that issue shall take the share of the property that the member so dying would take if living, unless a clear intention to the contrary is manifested by the will, deed or other instrument.

Acts 1927, ch. 13, § 1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 7598, 8092; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-305.

Cross-References. Representation to be per stirpes, §31-2-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 174, 448.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 117.

Law Reviews.

Class Gifts of Future Interests: When is Survival Required? (Herman L. Trautman), 20 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (1967).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1157 (1959).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1101 (1960).

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

Has Tennessee Abolished Its Ancient Class Gift Doctrine Or Only Modified It?, 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 129 (1977).

History of the Class Doctrine in Tennessee, 12 Tenn. L. Rev. 115 (1934).

Real Property — Future Interests — Tennessee Class Doctrine Reburied, 34 Tenn. L. Rev. 326 (1967).

Real Property — 1955 Tennessee Survey (Wade H. Sides, Jr.), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 1110 (1955).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

Testamentary Gifts of Future Interests: Is There an “Immediate” Problem with the Tennessee Antilapse Statute?, 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1987).

The Rule Against Perpetuities, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 641 (1950).

The Tennessee Class Doctrine: A Spectre At The Bar, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 943 (1951).

Wills, Trusts and Estates — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1238 (1957).

32-3-105. Death of devisee or legatee before death of testator.

Whenever the devisee or legatee or any member of a class to which an immediate devise or bequest is made, dies before the testator, or is dead at the making of the will, leaving issue that survives the testator, the issue shall take the estate or interest devised or bequeathed that the devisee or legatee or the member of the class, as the case may be, would have taken, had that person survived the testator, unless a different disposition thereof is made or required by the will.

Subsection (a) shall apply also to a revocable (living) trust that became irrevocable upon the death of its settlor or grantor. The surviving issue of a beneficiary who predeceased a settlor or grantor shall take the trust interest the beneficiary would have received had the beneficiary survived the settlor or grantor, unless the trust agreement provides otherwise.

Code 1858, § 2196 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 180, § 3); Shan., § 3928; Code 1932, § 8134; Acts 1941, ch. 61, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8134; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-306; Acts 1989, ch. 364, § 4; 1997, ch. 426, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of provisions, revocation of will by divorce or annulment, §32-1-202.

Representation to be per stirpes, §31-2-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 448, 455, 915, 989.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, §§ 137, 172.

Law Reviews.

Class Gifts of Future Interests: When is Survival Required? (Herman L. Trautman), 20 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (1967).

Joint and Mutual Wills in Tennessee — Validity, Contractual Limitations, and Effect on the Estate Tax Marital Deduction (Robert L. McMurray), 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 305 (1975).

Mutual and Strictly Reciprocal Wills in Tennessee (Edward Michael Ellis), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 877 (1974).

Property Law — Wills — Effect of Lapsed Residuary Gifts in the State of Tennessee, 73 Tenn L. Rev. 711 (2006).

Testamentary Gifts of Future Interests: Is There an “Immediate” Problem with the Tennessee Antilapse Statute?, 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 263 (1987).

The Tennessee Class Doctrine: A Spectre At The Bar, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 943 (1951).

Wills — Anti-Lapse Statutes — Beneficiaries of Class Gift Dead at Will's Execution, 9 Vand. L. Rev. 577 (1956).

Wills — Construction — Gift Over on Death Without Issue When Specified Time for Taking Possession is Mentioned by Testator, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 345 (1950).

To Lapse or Not to Lapse: Does the Tennessee Antilapse Statute Further the Testator's Intent?, 50 U. Mem. L. Rev. 169 (Fall 2019).

32-3-106. Testamentary additions to trusts.

A devise or bequest, the validity of which is determinable by the law of this state, may be made by a will to the trustee or trustees of a trust established or to be established by the testator or by the testator and some other person or persons or by some other person or persons (including a funded or unfunded life insurance trust, although the trustor has reserved any or all rights of ownership of the insurance contracts) if the trust is identified in the testator's will and its terms are set forth in a written instrument (other than a will) executed before or concurrently with the execution of the testator's will or in the valid last will of a person who has predeceased the testator (regardless of the existence, size or character of the corpus of the trust).

The devise or bequest shall not be invalid because the trust is amendable or revocable, or both, or because the trust was amended after the execution of the will or after the death of the testator.

Unless the testator's will provides otherwise, the property so devised or bequeathed:

Shall not be deemed to be held under a testamentary trust of the testator but shall become a part of the trust to which it is given; and

Shall be administered and disposed of in accordance with the instrument or will setting forth the terms of the trust, including any amendments thereto made before the death of the testator (regardless of whether made before or after the execution of the testator's will) and, if the testator's will so provides, including any amendments to the trust made after the death of the testator.

A revocation or termination of the trust before the death of the testator shall cause the devise or bequest to lapse.

This section shall have no effect upon any devise or bequest made by a will executed prior to March 17, 1961.

This section shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Testamentary Additions to Trusts Act.”

Acts 1961, ch. 303, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., § 32-307.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 25, 1011.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 4-609.

Law Reviews.

Decedents' Estates, Trusts and Future Interests — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Herman L. Trautman), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1253 (1961).

Family Trust in Estate Planning in Tennessee (Herman E. Taylor), 16 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 32 (1980).

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Collateral References.

“Pour-over” provisions from will to inter vivos trust. 12 A.L.R.3d 56.

Revocation of tentative [“Totten”] trusts of savings bank account by inter vivos declaration or will. 46 A.L.R.3d 487.

32-3-107. Contracts to make or revoke wills.

A contract to make a will or devise, or not to revoke a will or devise, or to die intestate can be established only by:

Provisions of a will stating material provisions of the contract;

An express reference in a will to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or

A writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

The execution of a joint will or mutual wills does not create a presumption of a contract to make a will, or to refrain from revoking a will.

Acts 1977, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 745, § 1; T.C.A., § 32-308.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1978, ch. 745, § 1, provided that this section shall be known and may be cited as the “Trautman Act of 1978.”

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 23, 26, 986.

Law Reviews.

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

The Howland Will Case: Mutual Wills and the Dead Woman's Statute (Donald F. Paine and Dan W. Holbrook), 39 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2003).

“The Law of Joint Wills, A Recent Development” (William L. Harbison), 24 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

32-3-108. Marital deduction.

IF,

A decedent dies after December 31, 1981;

Leaving a will executed, or a trust created, before September 12, 1981, that contains a formula expressly providing that the spouse is to receive the maximum amount of property qualifying for the marital deduction allowable by federal law;

The formula referred to in subdivision (a)(1)(B) was not amended to refer specifically to an unlimited marital deduction under federal law at any time after September 12, 1981, and before the death of the decedent;

The will or trust also contains a bequest to, or in trust for the benefit of, the decedent's spouse that qualifies as qualified terminable interest property pursuant to § 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(7));(2) THEN, the formula referred to in subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be construed to refer to the unlimited marital deduction allowable by federal law as amended by subsection (a) of § 403 of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981; provided, that the formula shall not be effective as to, or be deemed to, convey and transfer to the decedent's spouse, a sum in excess of the greater of:

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); or

Fifty percent (50%) of the value of the adjusted gross estate of the decedent as defined in § 2056(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 2056(c)(2)) prior to its amendment by the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981;so that such qualified terminable interest property, as well as the property passing to the spouse pursuant to the formula clause, will qualify for the unlimited marital deduction under § 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(7)), but the amount of property passing to the spouse under the formula clause shall not be increased or decreased from what would have passed thereunder prior to the enactment of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981;

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1)(D), the formula referred to in subdivision (a)(1)(B) will be effective as to or deemed to convey and transfer to the decedent's spouse an unlimited sum, if the court having jurisdiction over decedent's probate estate determines in a proceeding in which all beneficiaries of the estate are represented, that based on all the facts and circumstances the decedent intended or would have intended that the formula should be applied so as to take advantage of the unlimited marital deduction allowed by federal law as amended by subsection (a) of § 403 of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981. This subdivision (a)(3) shall apply only for decedents whose deaths occur after September 12, 1981, and prior to October 1, 1983, and, therefore, shall in no way affect the computation of the amount deductible for Tennessee inheritance tax purposes pursuant to §67-8-315(a)(6).

For a decedent dying before January 1, 2016, this section shall in no way affect the computation of the amount deductible for Tennessee inheritance tax purposes pursuant to § 67-8-315(a)(6) prior to October 1, 1983.

Acts 1983, ch. 26, § 1; T.C.A., § 32-309; Acts 1987, ch. 322, § 22; 2017, ch. 290, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16 provided that section 10 of the act, which amended this section, should take effect January 1, 2017. However, since a public chapter cannot become effective on a date prior to becoming law, the code commission deems the amendment by that act to take effect on July 23, 2017, in accordance with Tenn. Const. art. II, § 20. See Opinion of the Attorney General, June 25, 1982 (OAG 82-191).

Compiler's Notes. Section 403 (a)(1)(A) of the Economic Recovery Act of 1981, P.L. 97-34, deleted 26 U.S.C. § 2056(c) and redesignated its (d) as (c).

Section 403(a) of the Economic Recovery Tax Act of 1981, referred to in this section, is codified generally in 1 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., and in titles 10, 13 and 46.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “For a decedent dying before January 1, 2016,” for “This” at the beginning of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 23, 2017. See the Code Commission Notes.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

32-3-109. Trials for construction or interpretation of wills — Jurisdiction of courts.

Any court of record having probate jurisdiction has concurrent jurisdiction with chancery courts for the construction or interpretation of wills, or parts thereof, and for establishing lost, spoliated or suppressed wills.

Acts 1991, ch. 152, § 3.

Cross-References. Trials upon validity of wills, concurrent jurisdiction of courts, §32-4-109.

32-3-110. Power of appointment.

This section applies only to powers of appointment exercisable by will.

Capacity of holder of power. A power of appointment by will that is not subject to an express condition that it may be exercised only by a holder of a greater age may be exercised by a holder who has attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

Manner of exercise of power. Unless a contrary intent is evidenced by the terms of the instrument creating or limiting a power of appointment, a donee of a power of appointment exercisable by will may:

Make appointments of present or future interests or both;

Make appointments with conditions and limitations;

Make appointments with restraints on alienation upon the appointed interests;

Make appointments of interests to a trustee for the benefit of one (1) or more objects of the power;

Make appointments that create in the object of the power additional powers of appointment to permissible objects of the power of appointment pursuant to which the powers are created; and

If the donee could appoint outright to the object of a power, make appointments that create in the object of the power additional powers of appointment that may be exercisable in favor of such persons or entities as the person creating the power may direct, even though the objects of the additional powers of appointment may not have been permissible objects of the original power of appointment pursuant to which the additional powers are created; provided, however, that the donee may not create a power that would violate any applicable rule against perpetuities.

Disposition of trust property subject to power. In disposing of trust property subject to a power of appointment exercisable by will, a trustee acting in good faith shall have no liability to any appointee or take in default of appointment for relying upon a will believed to be the will of the donee of the power of appointment, for assuming that there is no will in the absence of actual knowledge thereof within three (3) months after the death of the donee, or for requiring that any will purporting to exercise a power of appointment be admitted to probate. The trustee's action in accordance with the preceding sentence shall not affect the rights of any appointee or taker in default of appointment to recover the distributed property from any person to whom the trustee has made distribution.

Applicability. This section shall be construed as being declarative of existing law and shall apply to all instruments granting general and special powers of appointment and all wills exercising those powers, whether existing or exercised before, on, or after May 8, 2002, except that no trustee shall be liable to any person in whose favor a power of appointment may have been exercised for any distribution of property made to persons entitled to take in default of the effective exercise of the power of appointment to the extent that the distribution has been completed prior to May 8, 2002.

Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 8.

Cross-References. Tennessee Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities, title. 66, ch. 1, part 2

Law Reviews.

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Perpetuities and the Genius of a Free State, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1823 (2014).

32-3-111. Specifically devised or bequeathed property.

A specific legatee or devisee has a right to the specifically gifted or devised property in the testator's estate at death or if the property has been disposed of and a contrary intention is not manifest during the testator's lifetime:

Any balance of the purchase price, together with any security interest, owing from a purchaser to the testator at death by reason of sale of the property;

Any amount of a condemnation award for the taking of the property unpaid at death;

Any proceeds unpaid at death on fire or casualty insurance on, or other recovery for injury to, the property; and

Property owned by the testator at death and acquired as a result of foreclosure, or obtained in lieu of foreclosure, of the security interest for a specifically devised obligation.

If specifically devised or bequeathed property is sold or mortgaged by a conservator or by an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, or if a condemnation award, insurance proceeds, or recovery for injury to the property are paid to a conservator or to an agent acting with the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal, the specific devisee has the right to a general pecuniary devise equal to the net sale price, the amount of the unpaid loan, the condemnation award, the insurance proceeds, or the recovery.

The right of a specific legatee or devisee under subsection (b) is reduced by any right the legatee or devisee has under subsection (a).

For the purposes of the references in subsection (b) to a conservator, subsection (b) does not apply if after the sale, mortgage, condemnation, casualty, or recovery, it was adjudicated that the testator's incapacity ceased and the testator survived the adjudication by one (1) year.

For the purposes of the references in subsection (b) to an agent acting within the authority of a durable power of attorney for an incapacitated principal:

“Incapacitated principal” means a principal who is an incapacitated person;

No adjudication of the principal's incapacity need occur before death; and

The acts of an agent within the authority of a durable power of attorney are presumed to be for an incapacitated principal, the presumption rebuttable by clear and convincing evidence of capacity.

Acts 2004, ch. 866, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Property-Administration of Wills-Common Law Ademption by Extinction and the Applicability of Tennessee Code Annotated Section 32-3-111 (Joshua A. Mullen), 75 Tenn. L. Rev. 577 (2008).

32-3-112. Disposition of residue.

If the residue of the decedent's testamentary estate or the residue of a revocable trust created by the decedent that becomes irrevocable at the settlor's death is devised to two (2) or more persons, the share of a residuary devisee that fails for any reason passes to the other residuary devisee, or to the other residuary devisees, in proportion to the interest of each in the remaining part of the residue, unless the decedent's will or trust agreement or §32-3-105 provides for a different disposition.

Acts 2007, ch. 8, § 2; 2012, ch. 886, § 8.

32-3-113. Application of federal estate tax or generation-skipping transfer tax law for certain decedents.

A will or trust of a decedent, who dies after December 31, 2009, but before January 1, 2011, that contains a formula referring to the “unified credit,” “estate tax exemption,” “applicable exemption amount,” “applicable credit amount,” “applicable exclusion amount,” “generation-skipping transfer tax exemption,” “GST exemption,” “marital deduction,” “maximum marital deduction,” or “unlimited marital deduction,” or that measures a share of an estate or trust based on the amount that can pass free of federal estate taxes or the amount that can pass free of federal generation-skipping transfer taxes, or that is otherwise based on a similar provision of federal estate tax or generation-skipping transfer tax law, shall be deemed to refer to the federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax laws as they applied with respect to estates of decedents dying on December 31, 2009.

Subdivision (a)(1) shall not apply with respect to:

A will or trust that is executed or amended after December 31, 2009, or manifests an intent that a contrary rule shall apply if the decedent dies on a date on which there is no then-applicable federal estate or generation-skipping transfer tax;

A will, if the personal representative files with the clerk of the court in which the will is being administered, within nine (9) months of the decedent's death, a written election to opt out of the application of the general rule of construction set forth in this subsection (a), together with the written consent to such election of each beneficiary who would have received a different amount of property under the will absent this election; or

A trust, if the personal representative, within nine (9) months of the decedent's death, elects to opt out of the application of the general rule of construction set forth in this subsection (a) by delivery of written notice to the qualified beneficiaries of the trust; provided, that the personal representative first obtains written consent to such election from each qualified beneficiary of the trust who would have received a different amount of property under the trust absent such election.

If a beneficiary from whom the personal representative of a will is required to obtain approval pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(B) or (a)(2)(C) is a trust, then the approval shall be obtained from each qualified beneficiary of such trust.

For the purpose of this subsection (a), the term “qualified beneficiary” shall have the same meaning as defined in § 35-15-103.

For the purpose of obtaining a beneficiary's or qualified beneficiary's consent, §§ 35-15-301 — 35-15-305 shall apply.

If there is no personal representative, then the trustee of the trust may make the election for the trust in the manner permitted for a personal representative under this subsection (a).

An election by the personal representative or trustee under this subsection (a) shall relate back to the date of the decedent's death for all purposes, including the application of title 67, chapter 8.

The reference to January 1, 2011, in this subsection (a) shall, if the federal estate and generation-skipping transfer tax becomes effective before that date, refer instead to the first date on which such tax shall become legally effective.

The personal representative, or any affected beneficiary under the will or other instrument, may bring a proceeding to determine whether the decedent intended that the references under subsection (a) be construed with respect to the law as it existed after December 31, 2009. Such a proceeding must be commenced within twelve (12) months following the death of the testator or grantor, and not thereafter.

Acts 2010, ch. 638, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 657, § 1 purported to enact a new section §32-3-113. Section32-3-113 was previously enacted by Acts 2010, ch. 638, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2010, ch. 657, § 1 was designated as §32-3-114 by the code commission.

32-3-114. Modification of will to achieve testator's objectives.

To achieve the testator's tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a will in a manner that is not contrary to the testator's probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

Acts 2010, ch. 657, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2010, ch. 657, § 1 purported to enact a new section §32-3-113. Section32-3-113 was previously enacted by Acts 2010, ch. 638, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2010, ch. 657, § 1 was designated as §32-3-114 by the code commission.

32-3-115. Written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property.

Notwithstanding the requirements of a holographic will, a will may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the will, other than money, evidences of indebtedness, documents of title, securities, and property used in a trade or business.

To be admissible under this section as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing:

Must:

Be either in the handwriting of the testator or signed by the testator;

Be dated; and

Describe the items and the devisees with reasonable certainty;

May be prepared before or after the execution of the will;

May be altered by the testator after its preparation, provided that the testator signs and dates the alteration; and

May be a writing that has no significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions made by the will.

If more than one (1) otherwise effective writings exist or a single writing contains properly signed and dated alterations, the provisions of the most recent writing or alteration revoke any inconsistent provisions of all prior writing.

A personal representative is not liable for any distribution of tangible personal property to the apparent devisee under the testator's will without actual knowledge of the written statement or list, as described in subsection (a), and the personal representative has no duty to recover property distributed without knowledge of the written statement or list.

If the writing is admitted to the probate proceeding as permitted in subsection (a), the recipient or recipients of items distributed in accordance with the written list or statement shall file a receipt for the item or items received in accordance with § 30-2-707.

Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 11.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.